District of Columbia statutes.
38-2333

Repealed

Authorization of appropriations.

Repealed.

Dec. 24, 1970, 84 Stat. 1579, Pub. L. 91-587, § 3
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410
1981 Ed., § 31-1833.
1973 Ed., § 31-1073.